Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-801
Act, how cited.

Sections 13-801 to 13-827 shall be known and may be cited as the Interlocal Cooperation Act.

Laws 1963, c. 333, § 2, p. 1071;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2202;

Laws 1991, LB 731, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB636, § 1.